Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
Has been certified as an organic farm for a period of at least three (3) years prior to the date of the initial application for a license;

Is primarily zoned agricultural and operates an on-farm market on that site in addition to possessing substantial acreage of green space at the date of initial application for a license; and

Maintains meeting centers for community events;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately six (6) acres of land that is adjacent to two (2) permanent structures which are owned by the same owner of the facility having approximately seventy thousand square feet (70,000 sq. ft.) of retail and office commercial space, and is located no more than three hundred feet (300') from a federal highway;

The facility has at least one (1) permanent structure with approximately sixty thousand square feet (60,000 sq. ft.) located no more than five hundred feet (500') from a federal highway and less than two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') south of a commercial railroad track. The structure is not less than five hundred twenty-five feet (525') and not more than five hundred seventy-five feet (575') above sea level. The structure was renovated in 2016 and 2017;

The facility formerly housed a supermarket business that closed in 2012;

The facility is approximately two thousand two hundred feet (2,200') to the south of a facility that is accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums that is open to the public;

The facility is located no more than seven thousand feet (7,000') from a railyard of a Class 1 railroad, as defined by the surface transportation board of the United States department of transportation; and

The facility is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(SSSS) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(SSSS). The licensee and any other entity in the facility licensed under chapter 4 of this title may, upon filing notice with the commission, share a common licensed area on the premises of the facility. The commission shall enforce chapter 4 of this title against each licensee on the premises of the facility and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a licensee for any violation committed by another licensee within a common licensed area on the premises of the facility. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific licensee for any underage sale based on the specific type of glass or the brand on the cup provided to the minor. In the absence of a glass or cup identifying the licensee, the commission may determine which licensee to cite for an underage sale. If the commission is unable to determine which licensee committed a violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the commission may issue a citation to one (1) or more licensees that share the common licensed area where the violation occurred;

The licensee and any other licensed entity in the facility that holds a license under this chapter may store beer and alcoholic beverages in a central storage location in the facility. Each licensed entity shall store its inventory of beer and alcoholic beverages in a separately locked cage or other storage area;

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(SSSS) means, for beer permitting purposes, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title. The beer permittee and any other entity in the facility that holds a beer permit issued by the local beer board may, upon filing notice with the beer board, share a common permitted area on the premises of the facility. The beer board shall enforce chapter 5 of this title against each permittee on the premises of the facility and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a permittee for any violation committed by another permittee within a common permitted area on the premises of the facility. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific permittee for any underage sale based on the specific type of glass or the brand on the cup provided to the minor. In the absence of a glass or cup identifying the permittee, the beer board may determine which permittee to cite for an underage sale. If the beer board is unable to determine which permittee committed a violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the beer board may issue a citation to one (1) or more permittees that share the common permitted area where the violation occurred;

Notwithstanding § 57-3-806(e), the owner of the facility may prohibit or restrict, through its lease or other agreements with other businesses, the on-premise sale of beer or alcoholic beverages by other businesses at the facility;

Notwithstanding § 57-4-101(n), table service is not required for the service of alcoholic beverages or beer as authorized by this subdivision (27)(SSSS); and

The facility, landlord, or any licensee shall provide periodic security for the entire licensed premises;

A commercially operated recreational facility, whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of a corporation, limited liability company, or association, or of a development in which it is located, owned, and operated by a corporation, limited liability company, or association, having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located in or adjacent to a residential real estate development containing between seven hundred (700) and eight hundred (800) acres, a portion of which was formerly the home of a music industry entertainer who began her career with a successful recording at the age of thirteen (13);

The facility has at least one (1) permanent structure, open to the public or to members and their guests, having at least two thousand square feet (2,000 sq. ft.);

The closest boundary of the real estate development in which the facility is located must be located no more than three thousand feet (3,000') from the right-of-way of Interstate 840 and situated between Cox and Patton roads;

The facility maintains a golf course having at least eighteen (18) holes, which has a current or past golf professional on staff at the golf course;

The facility has at least one (1) room or rooms that are regularly kept, used, and maintained as a place where meals are regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities and seating at tables for at least thirty (30) persons;

The facility is located on property with elevations that vary between less than seven hundred fifty feet (750') above sea level to more than nine hundred fifty feet (950') above sea level;

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The planning commission of a county in which the facility is located has approved of subdividing the property into more than four hundred (400) residential lots that can be offered for sale for home construction; and

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(TTTT) shall mean any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, paths, and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately twenty-seven (27) acres of land that is adjacent to a tributary of Arrington Creek and located along U.S. Route 96;

The facility has at least one (1) permanent structure constructed in 2016 with at least eight thousand four hundred square feet (8,400 sq. ft.) of climate-controlled space;

The facility is on property that has a lake with an island having approximately nine thousand square feet (9,000 sq. ft.) of space that contains outdoor amenities, including a sound system;

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) and not more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(UUUU) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including a barn, man-made island, paths, and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility possessing the following characteristics:

The facility is located on at least twenty (20) acres;

The facility provides overnight accommodations with no less than fifty (50) guest rooms;

The facility serves at least one (1) meal per day in a dining room that seats at least seventy-five (75) persons;

The facility is located on property that is within one-quarter (1/4) mile of the intersection of Carters Creek Pike and Southall Road; and

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including restaurants, cabins, lodges, clubhouses, swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, paths, and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) may be issued one (1) or more licenses for consumption on the premises;

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) may seek an additional license as a caterer under § 57-4-102(6);

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) may hold any of the licenses authorized under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) or may grant a franchise to one (1) or more entities for any or all such licenses;

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(VVVV) may deliver sealed bottles to any area within the licensed premises of the facility;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility operates a restaurant with not less than fifty (50) seats in the dining room, not less than six (6) seats at the bar, and outdoor seating on the wrap-around porch;

The restaurant is equipped to serve breakfast, lunch, and dinner and does so on a regular basis;

The facility operates an eighteen-hole golf course and has a large, log cabin style clubhouse with not less than seven thousand square feet (7,000 sq. ft.);

The facility serves as a wedding and event venue; and

The facility is located not more than six (6) miles from Interstate 40 and Interstate 840 and is situated in a county having a population of not less than one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred (113,900) and not more than one hundred fourteen thousand (114,000), according to the 2010 federal census and any subsequent federal census;

A facility operated either commercially or on a nonprofit basis that:

Is a community theatre and event center that officially opened in 1934;

Was renovated and reopened in 1974;

As of April 12, 2018, operates as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization;

Is a historic community and private event venue; and

Is located in a municipality with a population of not less than fifteen thousand sixty (15,060) and not more than fifteen thousand sixty-nine (15,069), according to the 2010 and any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that is:

Located on approximately two hundred forty-seven (247) acres, subject to a conservation easement on approximately two hundred (200) of the acres;

Located on a peninsula adjacent to the Tennessee River;

Located on property across which an abandoned railroad bed lies;

A venue for weddings, meetings, and events; and

Located in a county with a population of not less than one hundred twenty-three thousand one (123,001) nor more than one hundred twenty-three thousand one hundred (123,100), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is located on at least sixty (60) acres of land which came from an original land grant with a home on the property built in 1781;

Has a stream with a dam on the premises;

Has a restaurant that was primarily built from two wrecked barns, that serves a full menu of hot foods at least four (4) days per week, that possesses a full service kitchen, that has seating inside for at least sixty (60) persons at tables, and that has outdoor patio seats for at least twenty-five (25) persons;

Has a pavilion that seats at least one hundred twenty-five (125) persons;

Hosts various events, including, but not limited to, weddings, civic and other club meetings, church groups, and car shows; and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than fifty-six thousand eight hundred (56,800) and not more than fifty-six thousand nine hundred (56,900), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is located on approximately fifty-five (55) to seventy-five (75) acres;

Is located on the banks of the Powell River;

Has a restaurant that serves a full menu of hot foods at least four (4) days per week, that possesses a full service kitchen which includes at least a stove top, an oven, a refrigerator, and a freezer, that has at least three thousand five hundred square feet (3,500 sq. ft.) inside, that has an outdoor deck of at least one thousand five hundred square feet (1,500 sq. ft.), that has seating inside for at least eighty (80) persons at tables, and that has outside deck seating for at least eighty (80) persons at tables;

Possesses a beer license;

Makes available kayaks and tubes for rent for floating on the Powell River; and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than thirty-two thousand two hundred (32,200) and not more than thirty-two thousand three hundred (32,300), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is located on at least one-half (½) acre of land with at least one hundred sixty feet (160') of road frontage and is in a building with a convenience store with separate entrances;

Has a restaurant with a license to serve beer, and which serves a full menu of hot foods at least five (5) days per week, except for seasonal closings and renovations, and possesses a full-service kitchen with seating in the main dining area for at least fifty (50) persons at tables, a bar seating area of at least forty (40) persons at the bar and tables, an outdoor patio area with seats and picnic tables for at least forty (40) persons, an outdoor tiki bar with seating for at least eight (8) persons at the bar, and a covered porch off the bar area with at least eight (8) seats, and which hosts live music on a regular weekly basis;

Has an enclosed recreational and events building, with its own entrances, including garage doors, of at least two thousand three hundred square feet (2,300 sq. ft.), which is fully plumbed and in which pool, darts, and corn hole are played, and which hosts various private events and ticketed public events with an admission fee; and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than thirty-two thousand two hundred (32,200) nor more than thirty-two thousand three hundred (32,300), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(BBBBB) means any and all of the property that constitutes the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is located on at least one hundred seventy-five (175) acres of land that is situated on Pennington Bend adjacent to the Cumberland River;

Serves as a venue for weddings, meetings, tournaments, and events;

Includes an 18-hole golf course, a clubhouse with a restaurant that serves lunch and dinner with seating for at least sixty (60) guests, a golf shop, locker rooms, a covered outdoor pavilion with seating for at least two hundred (200) guests, and meeting rooms;

Is located less than one (1) mile from a hotel containing at least two thousand eight hundred (2,800) rooms, six hundred forty thousand square feet (640,000 sq. ft.) of meeting space, and nine (9) acres of indoor gardens;

Is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(CCCCC) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(CCCCC); and

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(CCCCC) means, for beer permitting purposes, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately three hundred and sixty (360) acres of land that is adjacent to a reservoir of the Tennessee River created by Watts Bar Dam;

The facility is located less than two (2) miles west of an area designated as a wildlife management area by the Tennessee fish and wildlife commission that is open to the public;

The facility is located within five (5) miles of Highway 72 in a county with a population of not less than fifty-four thousand one hundred (54,100) and not more than fifty-four thousand two hundred (54,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility is approximately twelve thousand feet (12,000') southeast of a private airport identified by the federal aviation administration;

The property that the facility is located on is not less than seven hundred twenty-five feet (725') above sea level nor more than one thousand feet (1000') above sea level;

The facility includes a restaurant, day spa, tennis courts, barn, farmhouse, fish pond, boat dock, hiking trails, cottages, and a full service inn, with at least twenty (20) rooms for lodging;

The facility serves as a venue for weddings, meetings, conferences, and events; and

The restaurant at the facility serves breakfast and dinner and caters for events, with seating for at least two hundred (200) guests;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(DDDDD) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(DDDDD);

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(DDDDD) means for beer permitting purposes any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title; and

The requirements of § 57-5-105(b)(1) do not apply to any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(DDDDD);

A commercially operated facility having the following characteristics:

The facility was built in 1894 and has been restored to represent its original features;

The facility has a seating capacity for approximately one hundred (100) persons;

The facility is a venue for weddings, receptions, reunions, and other similar events, and opened for business in January of 2017; and

The facility is located in a county with a population of not less than fifty-two thousand seven hundred (52,700) and not more than fifty-two thousand eight hundred (52,800), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility is a restaurant floating on Tims Ford Lake at a commercially operated marina on Sail Away Lane;

The facility is accessible by both water and land, with docking areas for watercraft and parking areas for vehicles;

The facility is licensed to sell beer; and

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) and not more than forty-one thousand one hundred (41,100), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility, whether operated by a corporation, limited liability company, or association, having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on Cordell Hull Lake on property leased from the United States army corps of engineers;

The facility has at least one hundred twenty (120) boat slips ranging in size up to sixty feet (60') in length;

The facility includes a full-service restaurant open to the public;

The facility maintains at least four (4) two-bedroom cabins and at least four (4) hotel rooms available for rent to the public;

The facility operates a full-service campground with at least twenty (20) campsites with septic, electric, and potable water hook-ups;

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than eleven thousand six hundred (11,600) nor more than eleven thousand seven hundred (11,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, sexual orientation, race, religion, or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(GGGGG) includes all of the property constituting the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility that:

Has a full-service restaurant that stands alone, or is part of a larger building or complex, but has its own entrance;

Has a full-service kitchen that possesses at least one (1) of each the following: a stove; an oven; a refrigerator; and a freezer;

Is open at least five (5) days per week, and serves at least twelve (12) meals each week;

Has seating for at least seventy-five (75) persons at tables and has seating in the bar area at the bar, on stools around tables, or chairs around tables;

Is located on at least eighteen (18) acres; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand two hundred (32,200) and not more than thirty-two thousand three hundred (32,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(HHHHH) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility; and

The property described under this subdivision (27)(HHHHH) may be divided into individual parcels or groups of parcels, and any commercial facility located on any of these parcels that meets the criteria in this subdivision (27)(HHHHH) is deemed to be a premier type tourist resort for purposes of obtaining a license;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility is located within six and one-half (6.5) miles of Interstate 24 in any county having a population of not less than thirteen thousand seven hundred (13,700) nor more than thirteen thousand seven hundred fifty (13,750), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility is located on Charlie Roberts Road;

The facility is licensed to sell beer; and

The facility is a music, concert, and entertainment venue located in a cave that is home to a public television program;

A commercially operated restaurant that:

Was built in 1892;

Has not less than one thousand two hundred ninety-five square feet (1,295 sq. ft.);

Has seating for not less than thirty-two (32) persons;

Is located not more than five hundred feet (500') from Dobbins Branch; and

Is located in a county with not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) and not more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Was built in 1977;

Operates a market and country store;

Is located on approximately three and one-half (3 ½) acres;

Is located not more than three thousand feet (3,000') from the junction of the Harpeth River and Wilkie Branch;

Serves prepared food on the premises; and

Is located in a county with not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) and not more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Operates as a community performing arts and civics center in a city with a population of not less than eighteen thousand six hundred fifty (18,650) and not more than eighteen thousand six hundred fifty-nine (18,659), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

Was originally built as a school in 1886;

Contains an auditorium with a full stage, a proscenium arch, and seating for not less than four hundred (400) persons; and

Contains conference and meeting rooms and a local history museum;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is a resort comprised of approximately four hundred sixty (460) acres adjacent to the Cumberland River;

Operates two (2) eighteen-hole championship golf courses;

Operates a restaurant that seats forty-six (46) persons;

Is utilized as a venue for weddings and similar events with garden seating for up to two hundred (200) persons, banquet room seating for up to one hundred fifty (150) persons, and gallery seating for up to sixty (60) persons;

Was originally established in 1986; and

Is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000) persons, according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

Operates a restaurant with seating for approximately fifty (50) patrons, with an extended porch for additional seating;

Operates an event center that serves as a venue for weddings, concerts, and similar events;

Is located within one (1) mile of Dale Hollow Lake, and within one hundred feet (100') of the Dale Hollow Quarry;

Is located on approximately eighty-five (85) acres; and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than seven thousand eight hundred fifty-one (7,851) and not more than seven thousand eight hundred sixty-five (7,865), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately twenty-two (22) acres of land;

The facility is located less than three (3) miles south of an area designated as a state park consisting of approximately nine hundred (900) acres that is open to the public and adjacent to a state forest having at least nine thousand (9,000) acres;

The facility is located within five (5) miles of Interstate 840 in a county with a population of not less than one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred fifty (113,950) and not more than one hundred forty thousand (140,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility is approximately fifteen thousand feet (15,000 ft.) east of a private motor racing complex originally constructed in approximately 2001 with a seating capacity of more than ten thousand (10,000);

The facility includes a cabin, pier, bridge, amphitheater, commercial kitchen, shop, pond, hall with an adjacent courtyard, a climate-controlled event center, and a manor constructed in the 1830s having at least seven (7) guest rooms for lodging;

The facility serves as a venue for weddings, meetings, conferences, and events; and

The restaurant at the manor serves breakfast and dinner, and caters for events, with seating for at least forty-five (45) guests. The facility has two (2) event centers that can accommodate at least two hundred (200) guests at each center;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(OOOOO) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(OOOOO);

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(OOOOO) means for beer permitting purposes any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title;

The requirements of § 57-5-105(b)(1) do not apply to any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(OOOOO); and

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(OOOOO) may seek an additional license as a caterer pursuant to § 57-4-102(6);

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

Is located on Norris Lake;

Has a marina with not less than one hundred seventy (170) slips;

Has not less than seven (7) houses and twenty-two (22) floating houses available for rent;

Has a restaurant with indoor and outdoor seating for at least one hundred seventy (170) patrons;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(PPPPP) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(PPPPP);

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

Operates a hotel with sixteen (16) guest rooms, with each floor other than the first floor equipped with a chef's kitchen, living room with a fireplace, and dining table;

Operates a catering kitchen for events on the premises;

Has event space of over eight hundred square feet (800 sq. ft.) located on the first and fourth floors;

Is a venue for weddings, dinner parties, business retreats, reunions, and similar events; and

Is located in a city with a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census; and

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(QQQQQ) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises are covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(QQQQQ);

A commercially operated facility that:

Is an event and music venue that holds concerts and hosts a farmers market;

Is located in a building built in the early 1900s by David Hugh Corlette;

Contains a specialty grocery store and offers fresh food service, with seating for approximately eighteen (18) patrons;

Began operating in August of 2018;

Has approximately three thousand three hundred square feet (3,300 sq. ft.) of commercial floor space;

Sits adjacent to Horton Highway;

Is within five hundred feet (500') of a community center and artsitorium; and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) and not more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 and any subsequent federal census; and

The premises of a facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(RRRRR) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has a marina with at least eighty-five (85) boat slips on Dale Hollow Lake at the confluence of the East and West Forks of the Obey River;

Has a restaurant with seating for approximately eighty (80) patrons;

Has assorted boats and at least twelve (12) cabins available for rent; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than five thousand (5,000) and not more than five thousand one hundred (5,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located approximately one (1) mile from Dale Hollow Lake, containing an area of ninety (90) acres;

Has a six-thousand-square-foot barn with a commercial kitchen used for events;

Has at least two (2) cabins for rent; and

Is located on Bolestown Road in a county having a population of not less than five thousand (5,000) and not more than five thousand one hundred (5,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially owned marina containing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least twenty-five (25) acres of land located off of Livingston Boat Dock Road in a county having a population of not less than seven thousand eight hundred fifty-one (7,851) and not more than seven thousand eight hundred sixty-five (7,865), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has a two-story restaurant that seats at least one hundred eighty (180) people;

Has at least three hundred fifty-five (355) boat slips and a full-service marina on Dale Hollow Lake; and

Includes at least ten (10) rental cabins;

A commercially owned marina containing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least forty (40) acres of land located off of state highway 294 in a county having a population of not less than seven thousand eight hundred fifty-one (7,851) and not more than seven thousand eight hundred sixty-five (7,865), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has a restaurant that seats at least fifty (50) people;

Has approximately three hundred fifty (350) boat slips and a full-service marina on Dale Hollow Lake; and

Includes at least eleven (11) rental cabins;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is located on approximately two hundred seventy (270) acres of land and sits approximately nineteen (19) miles south of highway 24 in a county with a population of not less than forty-five thousand (45,000) and not more than forty-five thousand one hundred (45,100), according to the 2010 and any subsequent federal census;

Is located on property that is separately licensed to produce, bottle, and store distilled spirits;

Is located on property that offers tours and tastings, as well as the retail sale of merchandise and bottles of spirits and contains the global headquarters for a premium Tennessee whiskey company;

Is located on property that includes a welcome center, three (3) tasting rooms, distillery building, barrel storage facilities, a pond, museum, bar, restaurant, commercial kitchen, miniature golf course, and live music venue;

Is located on property that serves as a horse breeding and training facility;

Is located on property that is a production site and a venue for weddings, meetings, conferences, concerts, and special events; and

Has a restaurant that serves lunch and dinner, and caters for events with seating for at least forty-five (45) guests;

The commission and any beer board having jurisdiction over the facility may issue one (1) or more licenses to one (1) or more different persons or entities that meet the qualifications of this subdivision (27)(WWWWW) provided, that the persons or entities obtaining licenses under this subdivision (27)(WWWWW)(ii) and any manufacturer licensed under § 57-3-202 comply with the requirements of § 57-4-110;

The premises of a facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(WWWWW) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility; provided, that the premises must not include the premises of a manufacturer licensed under § 57-3-202 or any other facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(WWWWW), except as authorized pursuant to § 57-4-101(p). The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing; and
